scripts/ru_lemmas/pos/adj.lexd
PATTERNS
RuLemmasAdj

LEXICON RuLemmasAdj
abadi<adj>:вечный<adj>
абади<adj>:вечный<adj>
ablā<adj>:глупый<adj>
аблā<adj>:глупый<adj>
ablā<adj>:простоватый<adj>
аблā<adj>:простоватый<adj>
abotā<adj>:глупый<adj>
аботā<adj>:глупый<adj>
abox<adj>:бестолковый<adj>
абох<adj>:бестолковый<adj>
abrador<adj>:с_пришитой_с_лицевой_стороны_тканью<adj>
абрадор<adj>:с_пришитой_с_лицевой_стороны_тканью<adj>
abrex̌umin<adj>:шелковый<adj>
абрех̌умин<adj>:шелковый<adj>
virex̌umin<adj>:шелковый<adj>
вирех̌умин<adj>:шелковый<adj>
abtar<adj>:ленивый<adj>
абтар<adj>:ленивый<adj>
avda-salā<adj>:семнадцатилетний<adj>
авда-салā<adj>:семнадцатилетний<adj>
avda-solā<adj>:семнадцатилетний<adj>
авда-солā<adj>:семнадцатилетний<adj>
awal-baӡ<adj>:скороспелый<adj>
аwал-баӡ<adj>:скороспелый<adj>
awalīn<adj>:первый<adj>
аwалӣн<adj>:первый<adj>
awezůn<adj>:висячий<adj>
аwезу̊н<adj>:висячий<adj>
aweӡůn<adj>:висячий<adj>
аwеӡу̊н<adj>:висячий<adj>
awezůn<adj>:привязчивый<adj>
аwезу̊н<adj>:привязчивый<adj>
aweӡůn<adj>:привязчивый<adj>
аwеӡу̊н<adj>:привязчивый<adj>
awobaland<adj>:высокомерный<adj>
аwобаланд<adj>:высокомерный<adj>
awozdor<adj>:голосистый<adj>
аwоздор<adj>:голосистый<adj>
owozdor<adj>:голосистый<adj>
оwоздор<adj>:голосистый<adj>
awz<adj>:глубокий<adj>
аwз<adj>:глубокий<adj>
awӡ<adj>:глубокий<adj>
аwӡ<adj>:глубокий<adj>
awɣůni<adj>:афганский<adj>
аwғу̊ни<adj>:афганский<adj>
afɣůni<adj>:афганский<adj>
афғу̊ни<adj>:афганский<adj>
agitātori<adj>:агитаторский<adj>
агитāтори<adj>:агитаторский<adj>
agitāturi<adj>:агитаторский<adj>
агитāтури<adj>:агитаторский<adj>
agranůmi<adj>:агрономический<adj>
аграну̊ми<adj>:агрономический<adj>
adabi<adj>:литературный<adj>
адаби<adj>:литературный<adj>
adang<adj>:прямой<adj>
аданг<adj>:прямой<adj>
adwodor<adj>:имущий<adj>
адwодор<adj>:имущий<adj>
ado<adj>:исключительный<adj>
адо<adj>:исключительный<adj>
adolatxo<adj>:справедливый<adj>
адолатхо<adj>:справедливый<adj>
azīz<adj>:дорогой<adj>
азӣз<adj>:дорогой<adj>
azolawůn<adj>:всякий<adj>
азолаwу̊н<adj>:всякий<adj>
azorsalā<adj>:тысячелетний<adj>
азорсалā<adj>:тысячелетний<adj>
azorsolā<adj>:тысячелетний<adj>
азорсолā<adj>:тысячелетний<adj>
azor-ǰūfi<adj>:разный<adj>
азор-ҷӯфи<adj>:разный<adj>
azor-ǰūfi<adj>:очень_хитрый<adj>
азор-ҷӯфи<adj>:очень_хитрый<adj>
aybdor<adj>:виновный<adj>
айбдор<adj>:виновный<adj>
aybi<adj>:с_недостатком<adj>
айби<adj>:с_недостатком<adj>
ayodor<adj>:стыдливый<adj>
айодор<adj>:стыдливый<adj>
ayyor<adj>:хитрый<adj>
аййор<adj>:хитрый<adj>
ayor<adj>:хитрый<adj>
айор<adj>:хитрый<adj>
ayoti<adj>:жизненный<adj>
айоти<adj>:жизненный<adj>
akīm<adj>:полезный<adj>
акӣм<adj>:полезный<adj>
akūmati<adj>:государственный<adj>
акӯмати<adj>:государственный<adj>
ukūmati<adj>:государственный<adj>
укӯмати<adj>:государственный<adj>
alami<adj>:печальный<adj>
алами<adj>:печальный<adj>
alafxor<adj>:травоядный<adj>
алафхор<adj>:травоядный<adj>
alafxur<adj>:травоядный<adj>
алафхур<adj>:травоядный<adj>
alyumīnin<adj>:алюминиевый<adj>
алйумӣнин<adj>:алюминиевый<adj>
alumīnin<adj>:алюминиевый<adj>
алумӣнин<adj>:алюминиевый<adj>
allā<adj>:пегий<adj>
аллā<adj>:пегий<adj>
alow<adj>:крупноузорчатые<adj>
алоw<adj>:крупноузорчатые<adj>
aloyid<adj>:отдельный<adj>
алойид<adj>:отдельный<adj>
aloyidā<adj>:отдельный<adj>
алойидā<adj>:отдельный<adj>
alol<adj>:съедобный<adj>
алол<adj>:съедобный<adj>
alol<adj>:идущий_впрок<adj>
алол<adj>:идущий_впрок<adj>
alol<adj>:честный<adj>
алол<adj>:честный<adj>
alol<adj>:подходящий<adj>
алол<adj>:подходящий<adj>
alolkor<adj>:добросовестный<adj>
алолкор<adj>:добросовестный<adj>
alpinīsti<adj>:альпинистский<adj>
алпинӣсти<adj>:альпинистский<adj>
altoy<adj>:ненасытный<adj>
алтой<adj>:ненасытный<adj>
altoy<adj>:ловкий<adj>
алтой<adj>:ловкий<adj>
alůmot<adj>:трудный<adj>
алу̊мот<adj>:трудный<adj>
amali<adj>:практический<adj>
амали<adj>:практический<adj>
amatarafā<adj>:всесторонний<adj>
аматарафā<adj>:всесторонний<adj>
ambêx̌cin<adj>:арчовый<adj>
амбêх̌цин<adj>:арчовый<adj>
ambax̌cin<adj>:арчовый<adj>
амбах̌цин<adj>:арчовый<adj>
ambex̌cin<adj>:арчовый<adj>
амбех̌цин<adj>:арчовый<adj>
anbax̌cin<adj>:арчовый<adj>
анбах̌цин<adj>:арчовый<adj>
ambori<adj>:прочный<adj>
амбори<adj>:прочный<adj>
amwazm<adj>:одного_веса<adj>
амwазм<adj>:одного_веса<adj>
amwazn<adj>:одного_веса<adj>
амwазн<adj>:одного_веса<adj>
amwor<adj>:ровный<adj>
амwор<adj>:ровный<adj>
anwor<adj>:ровный<adj>
анwор<adj>:ровный<adj>
āmiyatdor<adj>:значимый<adj>
āмийатдор<adj>:значимый<adj>
amyatdor<adj>:значимый<adj>
амйатдор<adj>:значимый<adj>
amīr<adj>:щедрый<adj>
амӣр<adj>:щедрый<adj>
amowoz<adj>:согласный<adj>
амоwоз<adj>:согласный<adj>
amsoyagi<adj>:соседний<adj>
амсойаги<adj>:соседний<adj>
amtan<adj>:одинаковой_величины<adj>
амтан<adj>:одинаковой_величины<adj>
amto<adj>:равный<adj>
амто<adj>:равный<adj>
amůmā<adj>:огромный<adj>
аму̊мā<adj>:огромный<adj>
amůmā<adj>:опухший<adj>
аму̊мā<adj>:опухший<adj>
amqad<adj>:одного_роста<adj>
амқад<adj>:одного_роста<adj>
amǰins<adj>:однородный<adj>
амҷинс<adj>:однородный<adj>
amǰinc<adj>:однородный<adj>
амҷинц<adj>:однородный<adj>
anga<adj>:другой<adj>
анга<adj>:другой<adj>
yanga<adj>:другой<adj>
йанга<adj>:другой<adj>
angilīs<adj>:английский<adj>
ангилӣс<adj>:английский<adj>
angilīsi<adj>:английский<adj>
ангилӣси<adj>:английский<adj>
angūrðin<adj>:виноградный<adj>
ангӯрδин<adj>:виноградный<adj>
andarɣamuč<adj>:упрямый<adj>
андарғамуч<adj>:упрямый<adj>
andêɣ<adj>:твердый<adj>
андêғ<adj>:твердый<adj>
indêɣ<adj>:твердый<adj>
индêғ<adj>:твердый<adj>
anoq<adj>:ровный<adj>
аноқ<adj>:ровный<adj>
anoq<adj>:с_пустыми_руками<adj>
аноқ<adj>:с_пустыми_руками<adj>
apūpakillo<adj>:совершенно_голый<adj>
апӯпакилло<adj>:совершенно_голый<adj>
apūpakilo<adj>:совершенно_голый<adj>
апӯпакило<adj>:совершенно_голый<adj>
arab<adj>:арабский<adj>
араб<adj>:арабский<adj>
arabi<adj>:арабский<adj>
араби<adj>:арабский<adj>
arāy-torā<adj>:трехструнный<adj>
арāй-торā<adj>:трехструнный<adj>
aray-torā<adj>:трехструнный<adj>
арай-торā<adj>:трехструнный<adj>
arakatdor<adj>:энергичный<adj>
аракатдор<adj>:энергичный<adj>
arāqin<adj>:потный<adj>
арāқин<adj>:потный<adj>
arāqin<adj>:потливый<adj>
арāқин<adj>:потливый<adj>
arbi<adj>:военный<adj>
арби<adj>:военный<adj>
ar-gūnā<adj>:разный<adj>
ар-гӯнā<adj>:разный<adj>
arzandā<adj>:достойный<adj>
арзандā<adj>:достойный<adj>
arzandā<adj>:догадливый<adj>
арзандā<adj>:догадливый<adj>
arzůn<adj>:дешевый<adj>
арзу̊н<adj>:дешевый<adj>
arzůn-bob<adj>:недорогой<adj>
арзу̊н-боб<adj>:недорогой<adj>
arzůn-buo<adj>:недорогой<adj>
арзу̊н-буо<adj>:недорогой<adj>
arzůn-buho<adj>:недорогой<adj>
арзу̊н-буҳо<adj>:недорогой<adj>
arzun-bao<adj>:недорогой<adj>
арзун-бао<adj>:недорогой<adj>
arzun-baho<adj>:недорогой<adj>
арзун-баҳо<adj>:недорогой<adj>
armani<adj>:армянский<adj>
армани<adj>:армянский<adj>
ar-meθā<adj>:ежедневный<adj>
ар-меθā<adj>:ежедневный<adj>
ar-mêstā<adj>:ежемесячный<adj>
ар-мêстā<adj>:ежемесячный<adj>
ar-moā<adj>:ежемесячный<adj>
ар-моā<adj>:ежемесячный<adj>
ar-moyā<adj>:ежемесячный<adj>
ар-мойā<adj>:ежемесячный<adj>
ar-mohā<adj>:ежемесячный<adj>
ар-моҳā<adj>:ежемесячный<adj>
a-rāng-aθ<adj>:разный<adj>
а-рāнг-аθ<adj>:разный<adj>
a-rang-aθ<adj>:разный<adj>
а-ранг-аθ<adj>:разный<adj>
ar-rāng-aθ<adj>:разный<adj>
ар-рāнг-аθ<adj>:разный<adj>
ar-rang-aθ<adj>:разный<adj>
ар-ранг-аθ<adj>:разный<adj>
a-rānɣāǰ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
а-рāнғāҷ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
a-rānɣāǰ-aθ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
а-рāнғāҷ-аθ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
a-ranɣāǰ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
а-ранғāҷ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
a-ranɣāǰ-aθ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
а-ранғāҷ-аθ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
ar-rānɣāǰ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
ар-рāнғāҷ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
ar-rānɣāǰ-aθ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
ар-рāнғāҷ-аθ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
ar-ranɣāǰ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
ар-ранғāҷ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
ar-ranɣāǰ-aθ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
ар-ранғāҷ-аθ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
a-rāngin<adj>:всякий<adj>
а-рāнгин<adj>:всякий<adj>
a-rangin<adj>:всякий<adj>
а-рангин<adj>:всякий<adj>
ar-rāngin<adj>:всякий<adj>
ар-рāнгин<adj>:всякий<adj>
ar-rangin<adj>:всякий<adj>
ар-рангин<adj>:всякий<adj>
arrūzā<adj>:ежедневный<adj>
аррӯзā<adj>:ежедневный<adj>
arūzā<adj>:ежедневный<adj>
арӯзā<adj>:ежедневный<adj>
artarafā<adj>:всесторонний<adj>
артарафā<adj>:всесторонний<adj>
arům<adj>:нечистый<adj>
ару̊м<adj>:нечистый<adj>
arůmzodā<adj>:незаконнорожденный<adj>
ару̊мзодā<adj>:незаконнорожденный<adj>
arům-pūmak<adj>:с_редким_оперением<adj>
ару̊м-пӯмак<adj>:с_редким_оперением<adj>
arům-pūnak<adj>:с_редким_оперением<adj>
ару̊м-пӯнак<adj>:с_редким_оперением<adj>
arům-pūmak<adj>:лысый<adj>
ару̊м-пӯмак<adj>:лысый<adj>
arům-pūnak<adj>:лысый<adj>
ару̊м-пӯнак<adj>:лысый<adj>
ar-xelā<adj>:разный<adj>
ар-хелā<adj>:разный<adj>
asal<adj>:сладкий<adj>
асал<adj>:сладкий<adj>
asli<adj>:настоящий<adj>
асли<adj>:настоящий<adj>
asli<adj>:похожий_на_когол<adj>
асли<adj>:похожий_на_когол<adj>
aslidor<adj>:благородный<adj>
аслидор<adj>:благородный<adj>
asosi<adj>:основной<adj>
асоси<adj>:основной<adj>
atapur<adj>:полный<adj>
атапур<adj>:полный<adj>
atmi<adj>:необходимый<adj>
атми<adj>:необходимый<adj>
aflok<adj>:худой<adj>
афлок<adj>:худой<adj>
aflotūn<adj>:находчивый<adj>
афлотӯн<adj>:находчивый<adj>
aftagi<adj>:недельный<adj>
афтаги<adj>:недельный<adj>
aftayi<adj>:недельный<adj>
афтайи<adj>:недельный<adj>
aftagi<adj>:еженедельный<adj>
афтаги<adj>:еженедельный<adj>
aftayi<adj>:еженедельный<adj>
афтайи<adj>:еженедельный<adj>
aftodā<adj>:старый<adj>
афтодā<adj>:старый<adj>
aftodsalā<adj>:семидесятилетний<adj>
афтодсалā<adj>:семидесятилетний<adj>
aftodsolā<adj>:семидесятилетний<adj>
афтодсолā<adj>:семидесятилетний<adj>
aftodum<adj>:семидесятый<adj>
афтодум<adj>:семидесятый<adj>
afrang<adj>:разнообразный<adj>
афранг<adj>:разнообразный<adj>
aftrang<adj>:разнообразный<adj>
афтранг<adj>:разнообразный<adj>
afůnat<adj>:хитрый<adj>
афу̊нат<adj>:хитрый<adj>
axtā<adj>:кастрированный<adj>
ахтā<adj>:кастрированный<adj>
ax̌ibnīnǰ<adj>:позавчерашний<adj>
ах̌ибнӣнҷ<adj>:позавчерашний<adj>
ax̌ībnůnǰ<adj>:позавчерашний<adj>
ах̌ӣбну̊нҷ<adj>:позавчерашний<adj>
ax̌ībůnǰ<adj>:позавчерашний<adj>
ах̌ӣбу̊нҷ<adj>:позавчерашний<adj>
ax̌ībīnǰ<adj>:позавчерашний<adj>
ах̌ӣбӣнҷ<adj>:позавчерашний<adj>
ax̌ibnīnǰ<adj>:вчерашний<adj>
ах̌ибнӣнҷ<adj>:вчерашний<adj>
ax̌ībnůnǰ<adj>:вчерашний<adj>
ах̌ӣбну̊нҷ<adj>:вчерашний<adj>
ax̌ībůnǰ<adj>:вчерашний<adj>
ах̌ӣбу̊нҷ<adj>:вчерашний<adj>
ax̌ībīnǰ<adj>:вчерашний<adj>
ах̌ӣбӣнҷ<adj>:вчерашний<adj>
aštodsalā<adj>:восьмидесятилетний<adj>
аштодсалā<adj>:восьмидесятилетний<adj>
aštodsolā<adj>:восьмидесятилетний<adj>
аштодсолā<adj>:восьмидесятилетний<adj>
aɣdal<adj>:способный<adj>
ағ̌дал<adj>:способный<adj>
aɣdar<adj>:способный<adj>
ағ̌дар<adj>:способный<adj>
aɣdal-mol<adj>:огромный<adj>
ағ̌дал-мол<adj>:огромный<adj>
aqêq<adj>:нагой<adj>
ақêқ<adj>:нагой<adj>
aqêqi<adj>:действительный<adj>
ақêқи<adj>:действительный<adj>
aqilā<adj>:трудный<adj>
ақилā<adj>:трудный<adj>
aqlā<adj>:трудный<adj>
ақлā<adj>:трудный<adj>
qalā<adj>:трудный<adj>
қалā<adj>:трудный<adj>
qelā<adj>:трудный<adj>
қелā<adj>:трудный<adj>
aqilā<adj>:трудно<adj>
ақилā<adj>:трудно<adj>
aqlā<adj>:трудно<adj>
ақлā<adj>:трудно<adj>
qalā<adj>:трудно<adj>
қалā<adj>:трудно<adj>
qelā<adj>:трудно<adj>
қелā<adj>:трудно<adj>
aqlidor<adj>:умный<adj>
ақлидор<adj>:умный<adj>
aqůni<adj>:справедливый<adj>
ақу̊ни<adj>:справедливый<adj>
aqqůni<adj>:справедливый<adj>
аққу̊ни<adj>:справедливый<adj>
aǰab<adj>:удивительный<adj>
аҷаб<adj>:удивительный<adj>
aǰinā<adj>:сумасшедший<adj>
аҷинā<adj>:сумасшедший<adj>
aǰoyīb<adj>:интересный<adj>
аҷойӣб<adj>:интересный<adj>
āzogi<adj>:членский<adj>
āзоги<adj>:членский<adj>
āl<adj>:мягкий<adj>
āл<adj>:мягкий<adj>
ālo<adj>:отличный<adj>
āло<adj>:отличный<adj>
āl-čūɣǰin<adj>:решенный<adj>
āл-чӯғ̌ҷин<adj>:решенный<adj>
ātůmi<adj>:атомный<adj>
āту̊ми<adj>:атомный<adj>
āx̌k<adj>:говорящий<adj>
āх̌к<adj>:говорящий<adj>
ax̌k<adj>:говорящий<adj>
ах̌к<adj>:говорящий<adj>
āx̌k<adj>:разговоривый_человек<adj>
āх̌к<adj>:разговоривый_человек<adj>
ax̌k<adj>:разговоривый_человек<adj>
ах̌к<adj>:разговоривый_человек<adj>
bādab<adj>:вежливый<adj>
бāдаб<adj>:вежливый<adj>
bāfzol<adj>:способный<adj>
